Hawaii statutes.
§576B-710 Foreign support agreement. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), a tribunal of this
State shall recognize and enforce a foreign support agreement registered in
this State.

(b) An application or direct request for recognition
and enforcement of a foreign support agreement shall be accompanied by:

(1) A complete text of the foreign support agreement;
and

(2) A record stating that the foreign support
agreement is enforceable as an order of support in the issuing country.

(c) A tribunal of this State may vacate the
registration of a foreign support agreement only if, acting on its own motion,
the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement would be manifestly
incompatible with public policy.

(d) In a contest of a foreign support
agreement, a tribunal of this State may refuse recognition and enforcement of
the agreement if it finds:

(1) Recognition and enforcement of the agreement is
manifestly incompatible with public policy;

(2) The agreement was obtained by fraud or
falsification;

(3) The agreement is incompatible with a support
order involving the same parties and having the same purpose in this State,
another state, or a foreign country if the support order is entitled to
recognition and enforcement under this chapter in this State; or

(4) The record submitted under subsection (b) lacks
authenticity or integrity.

(e) A proceeding for recognition and
enforcement of a foreign support agreement shall be suspended during the
pendency of a challenge to or appeal of the agreement before a tribunal of
another state or a foreign country. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next